Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.090

Business license—Expiration date—Prorated fees—Conditions of renewal.

(1) The department must assign an expiration date for each business license. All renewable licenses endorsed on that business license must expire on that date. License fees must be prorated to accommodate the staggering of expiration dates.

(2) All renewable licenses endorsed on a business license must be renewed by the department under conditions originally imposed unless a regulatory agency advises the department of conditions or denials to be imposed before the endorsement is renewed.

[ 2013 c 144 s 23; 1982 c 182 s 8.]